Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8547.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 8-2 of the General Laws entitled "Superior Court" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
8-2-15.2. Domestic violence calendar.
(a) Establishment. There is hereby established within the Rhode Island superior court a
separate calendar to be known as the "domestic violence calendar" for the hearing and disposition
of domestic violence cases within the jurisdiction of the superior court.
(b) Eligible cases. The domestic violence calendar shall include the following actions
within the jurisdiction of the superior court:
(1) All criminal proceedings alleging the commission of a felony offense constituting
domestic violence, as defined in § 12-29-2;
(2) All felony offenses involving violations of no-contact orders or protective orders arising
from domestic violence matters;
(3) All felony offenses involving the use, possession, or discharge of a weapon in
connection with a domestic violence offense; and
(4) Any other criminal proceedings arising from the same act or transaction or otherwise
related to a domestic violence matter, as the presiding justice or the court deems appropriate for
inclusion on the domestic violence calendar.
(c) Assignment of personnel. The presiding justice of the superior court shall assign
personnel to the extent warranted to hear cases on the domestic violence calendar and may provide

for the consistent assignment of such cases in order to promote continuity of judicial oversight.
where practicable.
(d) Magistrate. There is hereby created within the superior court the position magistrate,
who shall be appointed by the presiding justice of the superior court, with advice and consent of
the senate, for a period of ten (10) years, and until a successor is appointed and qualified. Nothing
contained herein shall be construed to prohibit the reappointment of a magistrate for one or more
additional ten (10) year terms, subject to the advice and consent of the senate. The person appointed
to serve as magistrate shall be a member of the bar of the State of Rhode Island. The magistrate
shall have the duties, responsibilities, powers and benefits as authorized in § 8-2-11.1.
(e) Priority of proceedings. Cases assigned to the domestic violence calendar shall be given
priority in scheduling and disposition, consistent with the rights of the parties.
(f) Concurrent jurisdiction. The "domestic violence calendar" shall have concurrent
jurisdiction with any other calendar of the superior court to hear and decide all criminal actions
brought pursuant to the violations of the chapters 5, 9, 29, 37, 47 and 68 of title 11 and any offense
constituting domestic violence as provided pursuant to § 12-29-2, as long as the criminal action
involves domestic violence as defined in § 15-15-1.
(g) Administration. The presiding justice may adopt administrative orders, rules, and
protocols as are necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including coordination,
where appropriate, with the Rhode Island district court and the Rhode Island family court.
(h) Construction. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of the
superior court to control its calendar, assign cases, or otherwise manage its docket as provided by
law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006413/SUB A
========
LC006413/SUB A - Page 2 of 3